Maryland, session 2025, SB0636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
20–102.
This title applies only in Frederick County.
20–1102.1.
(a) There is a beer and wine [consumption (BWC)] TASTING (BWT) permit.
(b) The Board may issue the permit to the holder of a Class A license.
(c) The permit authorizes the holder to allow for on–premises [consumption]
TASTING of beer and wine.
(d) (1) An applicant for the permit shall submit to the Board an application on
a form that the Board provides.
– 1 –

Ch. 825 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The Board may issue the permit without a public hearing.
(3) If an initial permit application is denied, the applicant may request a
public hearing before the Board.
(4) Renewal of the permit may be made when the license holder’s Class A
license is renewed.
(e) An individual may [consume] TASTE beer or wine covered by the permit in a
quantity not exceeding:
[(1) a single serving consisting of:
(i)] (1) 12 total ounces of beer; or
[(ii)] (2) 6 total ounces of wine[; or
(2) three individual sample servings of beer or wine in any combination,
each consisting of not more than:
(i) 2 ounces of beer; or
(ii) 1 ounce of wine].
(F) THE BOARD SHALL REGULATE:
(1) THE QUANTITY OF BEER AND WINE SERVED TO AN INDIVIDUAL;
AND
(2) THE NUMBER OF BOTTLES OR OTHER CONTAINERS FROM WHICH
THE QUANTITY IS SERVED.
[(f)] (G) (1) The permit authorizes the [consumption] TASTING of beer and
wine only on the licensed premises of the holder.
(2) The permit holder may not allow an open container to be taken from
the licensed premises.
(3) The permit holder may not serve open alcoholic beverages from a
drive–through window.
[(g)] (H) The annual permit fee is $200.
20–1102.2.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 825
(a) There is a beer, wine, and liquor [consumption (BWLC)] TASTING (BWLT)
permit.
(b) The Board may issue the permit to the holder of a Class A license.
(c) The permit authorizes the holder to allow for on–premises [consumption]
TASTING of beer, wine, and liquor.
(d) (1) An applicant for the permit shall submit to the Board an application on
a form that the Board provides.
(2) The Board may issue the permit without a public hearing.
(3) If an initial permit application is denied, the applicant may request a
public hearing before the Board.
(4) Renewal of the permit may be made when the license holder’s Class A
license is renewed.
(e) An individual may [consume] TASTE beer, wine, or liquor covered by the
permit in a quantity not exceeding:
[(1) a single serving consisting of:
(i)] (1) 12 total ounces of beer;
[(ii)] (2) 6 total ounces of wine; or
[(iii)] (3) 1.5 total ounces of liquor, which may be mixed with other
nonalcoholic beverages[; or
(2) three individual sample servings of beer, wine, or liquor in any
combination, each consisting of not more than:
(i) 2 ounces of beer;
(ii) 1 ounce of wine; or
(iii) 0.5 ounce of liquor, which may be mixed with other nonalcoholic
beverages].
(F) THE BOARD SHALL REGULATE:
– 3 –

Ch. 825 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) THE QUANTITY OF BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR THAT MAY BE SERVED
TO AN INDIVIDUAL; AND
(2) THE NUMBER OF BOTTLES OR OTHER CONTAINERS FROM WHICH
THE QUANTITY IS SERVED.
[(f)] (G) (1) The permit authorizes the [consumption] TASTING of beer, wine,
and liquor only on the licensed premises of the holder.
(2) The permit holder may not allow an open container to be taken from
the licensed premises.
(3) The permit holder may not serve open alcoholic beverages from a
drive–through window.
[(g)] (H) The annual permit fee is $400.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –